Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/TechTerms.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1954 N 1
SFX 1954 0 rGraphPlot .

SFX 1955 N 1
SFX 1955 0 rGraphQ .

SFX 1956 N 1
SFX 1956 0 Rho .

SFX 1957 N 1
SFX 1957 0 riangular .

SFX 1958 N 1
SFX 1958 0 rica .

SFX 1959 N 1
SFX 1959 0 rich .

SFX 1960 N 1
SFX 1960 0 ricted .

SFX 1961 N 1
SFX 1961 0 ries .

SFX 1962 N 1
SFX 1962 0 Riffle .

SFX 1963 N 1
SFX 1963 0 Right .

SFX 1964 N 1
SFX 1964 0 RightArrow .

SFX 1965 N 1
SFX 1965 0 RightAssociate .

SFX 1966 N 1
SFX 1966 0 RightVector .

SFX 1967 N 1
SFX 1967 0 rithmetic .

SFX 1968 N 1
SFX 1968 0 rjev .

SFX 1969 N 1
SFX 1969 0 Root .

SFX 1970 N 1
SFX 1970 0 RootIntervals .

SFX 1971 N 1
SFX 1971 0 RootIsolation .

SFX 1972 N 1
SFX 1972 0 RootSize .

SFX 1973 N 1
SFX 1973 0 rOptions .

SFX 1974 N 1
SFX 1974 0 RotateLeft .

SFX 1975 N 1
SFX 1975 0 RotateRight .

SFX 1976 N 1
SFX 1976 0 Rotation .

SFX 1977 N 1
SFX 1977 0 RotationPoint .

SFX 1978 N 1
SFX 1978 0 Round .

SFX 1979 N 1
SFX 1979 0 Rows .

SFX 1980 N 1
SFX 1980 0 rs .

SFX 1981 N 1
SFX 1981 0 rse .

SFX 1982 N 1
SFX 1982 0 rseBiorthogonalSplineWavelet .

SFX 1983 N 1
SFX 1983 0 rseElement .

SFX 1984 N 1
SFX 1984 0 rseEquilibrium .

SFX 1985 N 1
SFX 1985 0 rseGraph .

SFX 1986 N 1
SFX 1986 0 rseSort .

SFX 1987 N 1
SFX 1987 0 rseSortBy .

SFX 1988 N 1
SFX 1988 0 rseUpEquilibrium .

SFX 1989 N 1
SFX 1989 0 Rules .

SFX 1990 N 1
SFX 1990 0 Run .

SFX 1991 N 1
SFX 1991 0 rUnits .

SFX 1992 N 1
SFX 1992 0 RunProcess .

SFX 1993 N 1
SFX 1993 0 ry .

SFX 1994 N 1
SFX 1994 0 s .

SFX 1995 N 1
SFX 1995 0 S .

SFX 1996 N 1
SFX 1996 0 saki .

SFX 1997 N 1
SFX 1997 0 Sample .

SFX 1998 N 1
SFX 1998 0 SampleSize .

SFX 1999 N 1
SFX 1999 0 sarte .

SFX 2000 N 1
SFX 2000 0 Save .

SFX 2001 N 1
SFX 2001 0 SaveAsynchronous .

SFX 2002 N 1
SFX 2002 0 sberg .

SFX 2003 N 1
SFX 2003 0 sBetween .

SFX 2004 N 1
SFX 2004 0 Scale .

SFX 2005 N 1
SFX 2005 0 ScalePlot .

SFX 2006 N 1
SFX 2006 0 Scaling .

SFX 2007 N 1
SFX 2007 0 Scan .

SFX 2008 N 1
SFX 2008 0 ScheduledTask .

SFX 2009 N 1
SFX 2009 0 ScheduledTaskTime .

SFX 2010 N 1
SFX 2010 0 schild .

SFX 2011 N 1
SFX 2011 0 ScrollPosition .

SFX 2012 N 1
SFX 2012 0 sData .

SFX 2013 N 1
SFX 2013 0 SeaGreen .

SFX 2014 N 1
SFX 2014 0 Search .

SFX 2015 N 1
SFX 2015 0 SearchIndex .

SFX 2016 N 1
SFX 2016 0 Secant .

SFX 2017 N 1
SFX 2017 0 second .

SFX 2018 N 1
SFX 2018 0 seconds .

SFX 2019 N 1
SFX 2019 0 Seed .

SFX 2020 N 1
SFX 2020 0 Seeding .

SFX 2021 N 1
SFX 2021 0 Segment .

SFX 2022 N 1
SFX 2022 0 Selection .

SFX 2023 N 1
SFX 2023 0 SelectionFunction .

SFX 2024 N 1
SFX 2024 0 Selector .

SFX 2025 N 1
SFX 2025 0 SelectorBox .

SFX 2026 N 1
SFX 2026 0 SelectorBoxOptions .

SFX 2027 N 1
SFX 2027 0 SelectorSettings .

SFX 2028 N 1
SFX 2028 0 SelfLoops .

SFX 2029 N 1
SFX 2029 0 SemicircleDistribution .

SFX 2030 N 1
SFX 2030 0 SemidefiniteMatrixQ .

SFX 2031 N 1
SFX 2031 0 sen .

SFX 2032 N 1
SFX 2032 0 Separator .

SFX 2033 N 1
SFX 2033 0 Separators .

SFX 2034 N 1
SFX 2034 0 sEqual .

SFX 2035 N 1
SFX 2035 0 Sequence .

SFX 2036 N 1
SFX 2036 0 SequenceFunction .

SFX 2037 N 1
SFX 2037 0 Series .

SFX 2038 N 1
SFX 2038 0 SerretSystem .

SFX 2039 N 1
SFX 2039 0 Session .

SFX 2040 N 1
SFX 2040 0 Set .

SFX 2041 N 1
SFX 2041 0 SetBoettcher .

SFX 2042 N 1
SFX 2042 0 SetDistance .

SFX 2043 N 1
SFX 2043 0 SetIterationCount .

SFX 2044 N 1
SFX 2044 0 SetMemberQ .

SFX 2045 N 1
SFX 2045 0 SetPlot .

SFX 2046 N 1
SFX 2046 0 SetSizePacket .

SFX 2047 N 1
SFX 2047 0 Setting .

SFX 2048 N 1
SFX 2048 0 Settings .

SFX 2049 N 1
SFX 2049 0 Shading .

SFX 2050 N 1
SFX 2050 0 Shape .

SFX 2051 N 1
SFX 2051 0 Shapiro .

SFX 2052 N 1
SFX 2052 0 Shared .

SFX 2053 N 1
SFX 2053 0 SharedArrays .

SFX 2054 N 1
SFX 2054 0 Shell .

SFX 2055 N 1
SFX 2055 0 Shift .

SFX 2056 N 1
SFX 2056 0 ShiftFilter .

SFX 2057 N 1
SFX 2057 0 ShortBoxForm .

SFX 2058 N 1
SFX 2058 0 Shorten .

SFX 2059 N 1
SFX 2059 0 ShortenedQ .

SFX 2060 N 1
SFX 2060 0 ShortestPath .

SFX 2061 N 1
SFX 2061 0 ShortestTour .

SFX 2062 N 1
SFX 2062 0 ShortTimeFourier .

SFX 2063 N 1
SFX 2063 0 shtein .

SFX 2064 N 1
SFX 2064 0 side .

SFX 2065 N 1
SFX 2065 0 sIdentity .

SFX 2066 N 1
SFX 2066 0 Sides .

SFX 2067 N 1
SFX 2067 0 siemens .

SFX 2068 N 1
SFX 2068 0 Sienna .

SFX 2069 N 1
SFX 2069 0 sievert .

SFX 2070 N 1
SFX 2070 0 sieverts .

SFX 2071 N 1
SFX 2071 0 Sigma .

SFX 2072 N 1
SFX 2072 0 Sign .

SFX 2073 N 1
SFX 2073 0 SignificantByteFirst .

SFX 2074 N 1
SFX 2074 0 Signs .

SFX 2075 N 1
SFX 2075 0 SimsGroupHS .

SFX 2076 N 1
SFX 2076 0 Size .

SFX 2077 N 1
SFX 2077 0 SizeAdjustments .

SFX 2078 N 1
SFX 2078 0 SizeChange .

SFX 2079 N 1
SFX 2079 0 SizeLimit .

SFX 2080 N 1
SFX 2080 0 Skeleton .

SFX 2081 N 1
SFX 2081 0 Slant .

SFX 2082 N 1
SFX 2082 0 SlantEqual .

SFX 2083 N 1
SFX 2083 0 SlateBlue .

SFX 2084 N 1
SFX 2084 0 Slider .

SFX 2085 N 1
SFX 2085 0 Smallest .

SFX 2086 N 1
SFX 2086 0 SmallestBy .

SFX 2087 N 1
SFX 2087 0 SmirnovTest .

SFX 2088 N 1
SFX 2088 0 Smoothing .

SFX 2089 N 1
SFX 2089 0 sNotebook .

SFX 2090 N 1
SFX 2090 0 Solve .

SFX 2091 N 1
SFX 2091 0 sOnly .

SFX 2092 N 1
SFX 2092 0 SortingValue .

SFX 2093 N 1
SFX 2093 0 Soundfile .

SFX 2094 N 1
SFX 2094 0 Source .

SFX 2095 N 1
SFX 2095 0 sp .

SFX 2096 N 1
SFX 2096 0 sP .

SFX 2097 N 1
SFX 2097 0 Space .

SFX 2098 N 1
SFX 2098 0 Spacing .

SFX 2099 N 1
SFX 2099 0 Spacings .

SFX 2100 N 1
SFX 2100 0 SpanningTree .

SFX 2101 N 1
SFX 2101 0 SpecialCharacters .

SFX 2102 N 1
SFX 2102 0 SpecialOptions .

SFX 2103 N 1
SFX 2103 0 Specification .

SFX 2104 N 1
SFX 2104 0 Spectrogram .

SFX 2105 N 1
SFX 2105 0 spiral .

SFX 2106 N 1
SFX 2106 0 Split .

SFX 2107 N 1
SFX 2107 0 sPlus .

SFX 2108 N 1
SFX 2108 0 sPositioning .

SFX 2109 N 1
SFX 2109 0 sPositioningTokens .

SFX 2110 N 1
SFX 2110 0 SPrime .

SFX 2111 N 1
SFX 2111 0 SpringGreen .

SFX 2112 N 1
SFX 2112 0 sQ .

SFX 2113 N 1
SFX 2113 0 Square .

SFX 2114 N 1
SFX 2114 0 SquaredLossLayer .

SFX 2115 N 1
SFX 2115 0 SquareFree .

SFX 2116 N 1
SFX 2116 0 ss .

SFX 2117 N 1
SFX 2117 0 ssociative .

SFX 2118 N 1
SFX 2118 0 ST .

SFX 2119 N 1
SFX 2119 0 Stack .

SFX 2120 N 1
SFX 2120 0 StartsQ .

SFX 2121 N 1
SFX 2121 0 State .

SFX 2122 N 1
SFX 2122 0 StellatedDodecahedron .

SFX 2123 N 1
SFX 2123 0 Stem .

SFX 2124 N 1
SFX 2124 0 steradian .

SFX 2125 N 1
SFX 2125 0 steradians .

SFX 2126 N 1
SFX 2126 0 stère .

SFX 2127 N 1
SFX 2127 0 stères .

SFX 2128 N 1
SFX 2128 0 Store .

SFX 2129 N 1
SFX 2129 0 Stores .

SFX 2130 N 1
SFX 2130 0 Stream .

SFX 2131 N 1
SFX 2131 0 StreamMethods .

SFX 2132 N 1
SFX 2132 0 String .

SFX 2133 N 1
SFX 2133 0 StringCharacters .

SFX 2134 N 1
SFX 2134 0 StringPacket .

SFX 2135 N 1
SFX 2135 0 Strip .

SFX 2136 N 1
SFX 2136 0 StructureConstant .

SFX 2137 N 1
SFX 2137 0 Style .

SFX 2138 N 1
SFX 2138 0 StyleDefinitions .

SFX 2139 N 1
SFX 2139 0 StyleMenuListing .

SFX 2140 N 1
SFX 2140 0 Submit .

SFX 2141 N 1
SFX 2141 0 SubPlots .

SFX 2142 N 1
SFX 2142 0 Subset .

SFX 2143 N 1
SFX 2143 0 Subsets .

SFX 2144 N 1
SFX 2144 0 Substitutions .

SFX 2145 N 1
SFX 2145 0 Sum .

SFX 2146 N 1
SFX 2146 0 SurvivalFunction .

SFX 2147 N 1
SFX 2147 0 Symbol .

SFX 2148 N 1
SFX 2148 0 Symbols .

SFX 2149 N 1
SFX 2149 0 SymbolSize .

SFX 2150 N 1
SFX 2150 0 SymbolThickness .

SFX 2151 N 1
SFX 2151 0 Symmetric .

SFX 2152 N 1
SFX 2152 0 SymmetricDifference .

SFX 2153 N 1
SFX 2153 0 SyntaxStyles .

SFX 2154 N 1
SFX 2154 0 system .

SFX 2155 N 1
SFX 2155 0 SystemCache .

SFX 2156 N 1
SFX 2156 0 t .

SFX 2157 N 1
SFX 2157 0 T .

SFX 2158 N 1
SFX 2158 0 tability .

SFX 2159 N 1
SFX 2159 0 Table .

SFX 2160 N 1
SFX 2160 0 Tableau .

SFX 2161 N 1
SFX 2161 0 Tag .

SFX 2162 N 1
SFX 2162 0 Take .

SFX 2163 N 1
SFX 2163 0 TannerDistribution .

SFX 2164 N 1
SFX 2164 0 TaskObject .

SFX 2165 N 1
SFX 2165 0 Tasks .

SFX 2166 N 1
SFX 2166 0 tAsynchronousTask .

SFX 2167 N 1
SFX 2167 0 Tau .

SFX 2168 N 1
SFX 2168 0 TauDirichletSeries .

SFX 2169 N 1
SFX 2169 0 TauGeneratingFunction .

SFX 2170 N 1
SFX 2170 0 TauL .

SFX 2171 N 1
SFX 2171 0 TauTheta .
