Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/TechTerms.dic
achita/1994
AddTo/2015
alautun/1994
anker/1994
ANOVA/2159
Apart/2115
Apply/2066
argentino/1994
Asynchronous/2164,2165
attoampere/1994
attocandela/1994
attodalton/1994
attogray/1994
attohen/1961,1993,1994
attomole/1994
attovon/1994
aurure/1994
AutoIndent/2099
avowan/1994
bicron/1994
BlockchainTransaction/578,2072,2140
Borel/2163
bougie/1994
Bron/2063
bunsen/1994
caballiera/1994,2116
castellation/1994
centian/1994
centidalton/1994
centihen/1961,1993,1994
centijoule/1994
centiquoon/1994
centiyard/1994
chittak/1994
ColorFunction/2006
colpa/1994
Costa/1994
cruzado/1994
crypto/2154,2386
cumbha/1994
Debug/2161
decare/1994
decidalton/1994
decihen/1961,1993,1994
decikatal/1994
deciquoon/1994
deciyard/1994
decompile/1980
DirectedEdge/1994
draught/1994
Durfee/2113
eigenmode/1994
Escot/2156
EventHandler/2161
exaampere/1994
exacurie/1994
exahen/1961,1993,1994
exajoule/1994
exaohm/1994
exawatt/1994
Exclusions/2137
FaceGrids/2137
faggot/1994
Falting/1994
Farey/2035
FeedbackSector/2137
femtoan/1994
femtofan/1994
femtohen/1961,1993,1994
femtoliter/1994
femtoquoon/1994
fermi/1994
FieldHint/2137
Filling/2137,2274
Fine/2136,2288
floren/1994
Format/1989,2291,2292,2326
Frenet/2038
frigorie/1994
galvat/1994
GeoGridLines/2137
GestureHandler/2161
gibisecond/1994
gigacondun/1994
gigagray/1994
gigahen/1961,1993,1994
gigamole/1994
gigatesla/1994
gilbert/1994
halier/1994
hectocandela/1994
hectohen/1961,1993,1994
hectopièze/1994
hectoyard/1994
Higman/2075
hryvnia/1994
HTML/2000
hypersurface/1994
Inequality/2090
Interrupt/2048
inti/1994
kalpa/1994
kharsha/1994
kiloatmosphere/1994
kilodarwin/1994
kilohectare/1994
kilohen/1961,1993,1994
kilolambert/1994
kilooersted/1994
kilorem/1994
kilovon/1994
Klitzing/1994
Kolmogorov/2087
König/2002
Lagrange/2065
lanac/1994
LegendBorder/2097
LegendLabel/2097
liang/1994
Limit/2108,2109
Literal/2014
litron/1994
Lyapunov/2090
mache/1994
Mandelbrot/2041,2042,2043,2044,2045
maund/1994
megaan/1994
megadalton/1994
megahen/1961,1993,1994
megameter/1994
megarad/1994
megayear/1994
microatmosphere/1994
microdalton/1994
microgray/1994
microhen/1961,1993,1994
micromho/1994
micropascal/1994
microton/1994
milla/1994
milliarc/2018
millicalorie/1994
millidarcy/1994
milliemu/1994
millihen/1961,1993,1994
millijoule/1994
millimicrometer/1994
milliounce/1994
millitesla/1994
mingelen/1994
momme/1994
MouseAppearance/2161
musti/1994
nanocandela/1994
nanofarad/1994
nanohen/1961,1993,1994
nanoliter/1994
nanorem/1994
nebuchadnezzar/1994
NetInsert/2053
octonion/1994
orthocenter/1994
palma/1994
pathname/1994
Pattern/2035,2199
pentiamond/1994
petabyte/1994
petafarad/1994
petahen/1961,1993,1994
petalumen/1994
petaquoon/1994
petayear/1994
picocondun/1994
picogram/1994
picohen/1961,1993,1994
picolo/1994
picopascal/1994
picowatt/1994
poiseuille/1994
poundal/1994
promaxwell/1994
qian/1994
qubit/1994
quei/1994
Ramanujan/2167,2168,2169,2170,2171,2172
rema/1994
Riccati/2090
Rolf/2031
ropani/1994
Rudin/2051
sabine/1994
schepel/1994
SemanticImport/2132
seminorm/1994
Serre/2156
ShadowMesh/2137
shetland/1994
Spacing/1994
StabilityMargins/2137
stattesla/1994
StreamColorFunction/2006
stunde/1994
subnetwork/1994
sucre/1994
SurfaceMesh/2137
SymmetrizedArray/1989
tarea/1994
TemplateSlot/2035
teraampere/1994
teradalton/1994
terahen/1961,1993,1994
terakatal/1994
teraohm/1994
teratesla/1994
tesla/1994
Ticks/2137
toise/1994
Translate/2050,2341
trilinear/1994
tuple/1994
Unset/2052
uralternative/1994
VectorColorFunction/2006
vedro/1994
vendekahen/1961,1993,1994
vendekakelvin/1994
vendekavolt/1994
viertel/1994
ViewPoint/2027
WebImage/2014
webpage/1994
weewan/1994
whalevon/1994
XSL/2157
yabiki/1994
yoctobecquerel/1994
yoctogram/1994
yoctohen/1961,1993,1994
yoctonewton/1994
yoctowatt/1994
yottacandela/1994
yottagram/1994
yottahen/1961,1993,1994
yottameter/1994
yottavon/1994
zecondun/1994
zeptocondun/1994
zeptohen/1961,1993,1994
zeptonewton/1994
zeptowatt/1994
zettacandela/1994
zettagram/1994
zettahen/1961,1993,1994
zettameter/1994
zettavon/1994
$FrontEnd/2039
$ImagingDevice/1994
